Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-867
Teacher's or administrator's certificate; revocation; suspension; effect.

The revocation of a person's teacher's or administrator's certificate by the board shall automatically revoke any and all Nebraska certificates held by the person. A teacher's or administrator's certificate which has been suspended shall be automatically reinstated at the end of the suspension if such certificate did not expire during the period of suspension. If the certificate expired during the period of suspension, the holder of the expired certificate may secure a new certificate by applying for and by meeting the certification requirements at the time of application for the new certificate. A person whose teacher's or administrator's certificate has been revoked may apply for a new certificate at the expiration of any period of ineligibility fixed by the board by applying for and by meeting the certification requirements at the time of application for the new certificate.

Laws 1989, LB 575, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1282.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 492;

Laws 2024, LB1306, § 4.
July 19, 2024